Nebraska, session 109, LB192.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 68-1017.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-1017.02 (1)(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall apply
for and utilize to the maximum extent possible, within limits established by
the Legislature, any and all appropriate options available to the state under
the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and regulations adopted
under such program to maximize the number of Nebraska residents being served
under such program within such limits. The department shall seek to maximize
federal funding for such program and minimize the utilization of General Funds
for such program and shall employ the personnel necessary to determine the
options available to the state and issue the report to the Legislature required
by subdivision (b) of this subsection.
(b) The department shall submit electronically an annual report to the
Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature by December 1 on efforts
by the department to carry out the provisions of this subsection. Such report
shall provide the committee with all necessary and appropriate information to
enable the committee to conduct a meaningful evaluation of such efforts. Such
information shall include, but not be limited to, a clear description of
various options available to the state under the federal Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program, the department's evaluation of and any action taken by the
department with respect to such options, the number of persons being served
under such program, and any and all costs and expenditures associated with such
program.
(c) The Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature, after
receipt and evaluation of the report required in subdivision (b) of this
subsection, shall issue recommendations to the department on any further action
necessary by the department to meet the requirements of this section.
(2)(a) The department shall develop a state outreach plan to promote
access by eligible persons to benefits of the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program. The plan shall meet the criteria established by the Food and Nutrition
Service of the United States Department of Agriculture for approval of state
outreach plans. The Department of Health and Human Services may apply for and
accept gifts, grants, and donations to develop and implement the state outreach
plan.
(b) For purposes of developing and implementing the state outreach plan,
the department shall partner with one or more counties or nonprofit
organizations. If the department enters into a contract with a nonprofit
organization relating to the state outreach plan, the contract may specify that
the nonprofit organization is responsible for seeking sufficient gifts, grants,
or donations necessary for the development and implementation of the state
outreach plan and may additionally specify that any costs to the department
associated with the award and management of the contract or the implementation
or administration of the state outreach plan shall be paid out of private or
federal funds received for development and implementation of the state outreach
plan.
(c) The department shall submit the state outreach plan to the Food and
Nutrition Service of the United States Department of Agriculture for approval
on or before August 1, 2011, and shall request any federal matching funds that
may be available upon approval of the state outreach plan. It is the intent of
the Legislature that the State of Nebraska and the Department of Health and
Human Services use any additional public or private funds to offset costs
associated with increased caseload resulting from the implementation of the
state outreach plan.
(d) The department shall be exempt from implementing or administering a
state outreach plan under this subsection, but not from developing such a plan,
if it does not receive private or federal funds sufficient to cover the
department's costs associated with the implementation and administration of the
plan, including any costs associated with increased caseload resulting from the
implementation of the plan.
(3)(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(i) Hard work be rewarded and no disincentives to work exist for
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program participants;
(ii) Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program participants be enabled to
advance in employment, through greater earnings or new, better-paying
-1-

LB192 LB192
2025 2025
employment;
(iii) Participants in employment and training pilot programs be able to
maintain Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits while seeking
employment with higher wages that allow them to reduce or terminate such
program benefits; and
(iv) Nebraska better utilize options under the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program that other states have implemented to encourage work and
employment.
(b)(i) The department shall create a TANF-funded program or policy that,
in compliance with federal law, establishes categorical eligibility for federal
food assistance benefits pursuant to the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program to maximize the number of Nebraska residents being served under such
program in a manner that does not increase the current gross income eligibility
limit except as otherwise provided in subdivision (3)(b)(ii) of this section.
(ii) Such Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, such TANF-
funded program or policy shall increase the gross income eligibility limit to
one hundred sixty-five percent of the federal Office of Management and Budget
income poverty guidelines as allowed under federal law and under 7 C.F.R.
273.2(j)(2), as such law and regulation existed on April 1, 2021, but shall not
increase the net income eligibility limit. Beginning October 1, 2025, the gross
income eligibility limit shall return to the amount used prior to the increase
required by this subdivision. The department shall evaluate the TANF-funded
program or policy created pursuant to this subsection and provide a report
electronically to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature
and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst on or before December 15 of each year
regarding the gross income eligibility limit and whether it maximizes the
number of Nebraska residents being served under the program or policy. The
evaluation shall include an identification and determination of additional
administrative costs resulting from the increase to the gross income
eligibility limit, a recommendation regarding the gross income eligibility
limit, and a determination of the availability of federal funds for the program
or policy.
(iii) To the extent federal funds are available to the Department of Labor
for the SNAP Next Step Program, until September 30, 2023, any recipient of
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits whose household income is
between one hundred thirty-one and one hundred sixty-five percent of the
federal Office of Management and Budget income poverty guidelines and who is
not exempt from work participation requirements shall be encouraged to
participate in the SNAP Next Step Program administered by the Department of
Labor if the recipient is eligible to participate in the program and the
program's services are available in the county in which such household is
located. It is the intent of the Legislature that no General Funds be utilized
by the Department of Labor for the processes outlined in this subdivision
(iii). For purposes of this section, SNAP Next Step Program means a partnership
program between the Department of Health and Human Services and the Department
of Labor to assist under-employed and unemployed recipients of Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program benefits in finding self-sufficient employment.
(iv) Such TANF-funded program or policy shall eliminate all asset limits
for eligibility for federal food assistance benefits, except that the total of
liquid assets which includes cash on hand and funds in personal checking and
savings accounts, money market accounts, and share accounts shall not exceed
twenty-five thousand dollars pursuant to the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program, as allowed under federal law and under 7 C.F.R. 273.2(j)(2).
(v) This subsection becomes effective only if the department receives
funds pursuant to federal participation that may be used to implement this
subsection.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Federal law means the federal Food and Nutrition Act of 2008, 7 U.S.C.
2011 et seq., and regulations adopted under the act; and
(ii) TANF means the federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families
program established in 42 U.S.C. 601 et seq.
(4)(a) Within the limits specified in this subsection, the State of
Nebraska opts out of the provision of the federal Personal Responsibility and
Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, as such act existed on January 1,
2009, that eliminates eligibility for the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program for any person convicted of a felony involving the possession, use, or
distribution of a controlled substance.
(b) A person shall be ineligible for Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program benefits under this subsection if he or she (i) has had three or more
felony convictions for the possession or use of a controlled substance or (ii)
has been convicted of a felony involving the sale or distribution of a
controlled substance or the intent to sell or distribute a controlled
substance. A person with one or two felony convictions for the possession or
use of a controlled substance shall only be eligible to receive Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program benefits under this subsection if he or she is
participating in or has completed a state-licensed or nationally accredited
substance abuse treatment program since the date of conviction. The
determination of such participation or completion shall be made by the
treatment provider administering the program.
(5) Unless expressly required by federal law, the department shall not
seek, apply for, accept, or renew a waiver of any work requirement established
by the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program under 7 U.S.C. 2015(o), as
such section existed on January 1, 2025, except that the department may
-2-

LB192 LB192
2025 2025
exercise the state's option to provide an exemption from the work requirement
under 7 U.S.C. 2015(o)(6), as such section existed on January 1, 2025.
(6) The department may, at its discretion, exercise its authority under 7
U.S.C. 2015(d), as such section existed on January 1, 2025, to require
individuals, unless specifically exempted by federal regulations or law, to
participate in an employment and training program as defined in 7 U.S.C.
2015(d)(4), as such section existed on January 1, 2025.
Sec. 2. Original section 68-1017.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-